Wyoming, session 2026, SF0089.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 15-10-107 is amended to read:

15-10-107. Tax exemption for public property;
requirements; exception.

(a) The property of a municipality or county acquired
or held pursuant to this chapter is public property used
SF0089

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0369
for essential public, governmental purposes and is exempt
from all taxes and special assessments of any public body,
subject to all of the following:.

(i) This tax and assessment exemption shall not
apply unless the property acquired or held pursuant to this
chapter is one hundred percent (100%) owned by a
municipality, county or agency or other entity that is
under the full and complete control of the municipality or
county;

(ii) This tax and assessment exemption does not
apply to any portion of a project used for a profitmaking
enterprise, but in taxing those portions, appropriate
allowance shall be made for any expenditure by a
municipality or county for utilities or other public
services which it provides to the property;.

(iii) In lieu of taxes on property exempt under
this section, a municipality or county may agree to make
such payments to any public body as it finds consistent
with the maintenance of the low-rent character of housing
SF0089

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0369
projects and the achievement of the purpose of this
chapter.

Section 2. This act shall apply to all taxpayers,
cities, towns and counties beginning January 1, 2026.

Section 3. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)
SF0089